Colorado statutes. TITLE 6 Consumer and Commercial Affairs
PART 7 SPECIFIC PROVISIONS
6-1-705. Dance studios - deceptive trade practices.

A person engages in a deceptive trade practice when, in the course of such person's business, vocation, or occupation, such person engages in one or more of the following activities or practices in connection with the advertisement, sale, or performance of contracts for dance studio services in which the total amount of the obligation that the purchaser undertakes is in excess of five hundred dollars:

Fails to execute a written contract and to provide a copy of the contract to the purchaser at the time the purchaser signs it;

Fails to include, printed in ten-point, bold-faced type in the contract:

The total amount of the obligation the purchaser undertakes;

All goods and services that the purchaser is to receive under the contract set forth in specific terms, including the total number or hours of dance instruction to be given by the dance studio under the contract broken down by different hourly rates, if applicable, and all other goods and services;

The itemized cost of all goods and services to be provided under the contract, including but not limited to the cost per hour of dance instruction and the different hourly rates for different types of dance lessons, if any, and any charges to be paid by the purchaser for cost of travel, accommodations, or other expenses of dance studio owners, operators, managers, agents, or employees, the total cost of which shall equal the amount to be specified in the contract pursuant to subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (b); and

The purchaser's right to cancel as specified in paragraphs (c) to (e) of this subsection (1);

Fails to include in the contract the following statement in bold-faced type under the conspicuous caption:

Fails to allow the contract to be canceled by the purchaser upon the purchaser's serving written notice to the dance studio;

Fails, upon cancellation of a contract for dance studio services, to refund to the purchaser all prepayments made under the contract, minus the total of:

The amount equal to the cost of goods and services actually received by the purchaser under the contract; and

An amount of liquidated damages equal to not more than ten percent of the cost of the remaining goods and services not received by the purchaser;

Subtracts a total amount under subparagraphs (I) and (II) of paragraph (e) of this subsection (1) that exceeds the total amount of the obligation as set out in subparagraph (I) of paragraph (b) of this subsection (1);

Fails to have a performance bond in the amount of twenty-five thousand dollars, as to each studio, location, or owner, for the benefit of any person who enters into a contract for dance studio services in which the total amount of the obligation that the purchaser undertakes is in excess of five hundred dollars and who is damaged by the failure of the dance studio to provide the services specified in the contract or by the failure of the dance studio to comply with this section, which performance bond guarantees the dance studio's performance of its contractual obligations with the purchaser in accordance with the provisions of this section, or fails to disclose in the contract with such purchaser the existence of the performance bond;

Sells or induces any person to purchase or to become obligated directly or contingently, or both, under more than one contract for dance studio services at the same time for the purpose of avoiding the provisions of this section; or

Assigns or accepts an assignment of dance studio services without the written consent of the purchaser.

PURCHASER'S RIGHT TO CANCEL:

YOU, THE PURCHASER, MAY CANCEL THIS CONTRACT AT ANY TIME DURING THE TERM OF ITS EFFECTIVENESS. YOU MUST GIVE WRITTEN NOTICE TO THE DANCE STUDIO THAT YOU DO NOT WANT TO BE FURTHER BOUND BY THIS CONTRACT. THE NOTICE OF CANCELLATION MAY BE SERVED IN PERSON, BY TELEGRAM, OR BY MAIL TO THE DANCE STUDIO AT THE ADDRESS STATED IN THIS CONTRACT OR AT THE LOCATION WHERE DANCE LESSONS ARE CONDUCTED. WITHIN THIRTY DAYS AFTER RECEIPT OF YOUR NOTICE OF CANCELLATION, THE DANCE STUDIO SHALL REFUND TO YOU THE CONTRACT PRICE LESS THE COST OF GOODS AND SERVICES ALREADY RECEIVED BY YOU AND AN AMOUNT OF LIQUIDATED DAMAGES EQUAL TO NOT MORE THAN TEN PERCENT OF THE COST OF THE REMAINING GOODS AND SERVICES.

Source:

L. 99:

Entire part added with relocations, p. 645, § 2, effective May 18.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 6-1-105 (1)(w), as it existed prior to 1999.

6-1-706. Buyers' clubs - deceptive trade practices.

A person engages in a deceptive trade practice when, in the course of such person's business, vocation, or occupation, such person engages in one or more of the following activities or practices in connection with the advertisement, sale, or performance of any contract of membership in a buyers' club in which the price of the membership equals or exceeds one hundred dollars:

Fails to allow any purchaser of a membership in a buyers' club to rescind the membership contract at any time prior to the close of business on the next business day following the day the purchaser signs the contract;

Fails to provide in the membership contract the following mandatory disclosure under the heading:

Fails to refund all payments made pursuant to the membership contract within fifteen days after the buyers' club receives notice of cancellation from the purchaser.

PURCHASER'S RIGHT TO CANCEL:

THE PURCHASER MAY CANCEL THIS CONTRACT FOR ANY REASON AT ANY TIME PRIOR TO THE CLOSE OF BUSINESS ON THE NEXT BUSINESS DAY FOLLOWING THE DAY THE PURCHASER SIGNS THE MEMBERSHIP CONTRACT BY DELIVERING OR MAILING TO THE BUYERS' CLUB WRITTEN NOTICE OF CANCELLATION. NOTICE OF CANCELLATION, IF SENT BY MAIL, IS DEEMED TO BE GIVEN AS OF THE DATE THE MAILED NOTICE WAS POSTMARKED.

Said heading and disclosure shall be in capital letters in no less than ten-point, bold-faced type.

Source:

L. 99:

Entire part added with relocations, p. 646, § 2, effective May 18.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 6-1-105 (1)(bb), as it existed prior to 1999.

6-1-707. Use of title or degree - deceptive trade practice.

A person engages in a deceptive trade practice when, in the course of the person's business, vocation, or occupation, the person:

Claims, either orally or in writing, to possess either an academic degree or an honorary degree or the title associated with said degree, unless the person has, in fact, been awarded said degree from an institution that is:

Accredited by a regional or professional accrediting agency recognized by the United States department of education or the council on postsecondary accreditation, or is recognized as a candidate for accreditation by such an agency;

Provided, operated, and supported by a state government or any of its political subdivisions or by the federal government;

A school, institute, college, or university chartered outside the United States, the academic degree from which has been validated by an accrediting agency approved by the United States department of education as equivalent to the baccalaureate or postbaccalaureate degree conferred by a regionally accredited college or university in the United States;

A religious seminary, institute, college, or university that offers only educational programs that prepare students for a religious vocation, career, occupation, profession, or lifework, and the nomenclature of whose certificates, diplomas, or degrees clearly identifies the religious character of the educational program;

Authorized to grant degrees pursuant to article 2 of title 23, C.R.S.

This paragraph (a) shall not apply to persons claiming degrees or certificates that were submitted as a requirement of the application process for licensure, certification, or registration pursuant to title 12, C.R.S.

No person awarded a doctorate degree from an institution not listed in paragraph (a) of this subsection (1) shall claim in the state, either orally or in writing, the title "Dr." before the person's name or any mark, appellation, or series of letters, numbers, or words, such as, but not limited to, "Ph.D.","Ed.D.", "D.N.", or "D.Th.", which signify, purport, or are generally taken to signify satisfactory completion of the requirements of a doctorate degree, after the person's name.

Claims either orally or in writing to be a "dietitian", "dietician", "certified dietitian", or "certified dietician" or uses the abbreviation "C.D." or "D." to indicate that such person is a dietitian, unless such person:

Possesses a baccalaureate, masters, or doctorate degree in human nutrition, foods and nutrition, dietetics, nutrition education, food systems management, or public health nutrition from an institution that is:

Accredited by a regional or professional accrediting agency recognized by the United States department of education or the council on postsecondary accreditation, or is recognized as a candidate for accreditation by such accrediting agency;

Authorized to grant degrees pursuant to article 2 of title 23, C.R.S.; or

A school, institute, college, or university chartered outside the United States, the academic degree from which has been validated by an accrediting agency approved by the United States department of education as equivalent to a baccalaureate or postbaccalaureate degree conferred by a regionally accredited college or university in the United States; and

Meets one of the following:

Completes at least nine hundred hours of a planned, continuous, preprofessional work experience in a nutrition or dietetic practice under the supervision of a qualified dietitian; or

Holds a certificate of registered dietitian through the commission on dietetic registration;

Repealed.

Claims either orally or in writing to be a "certified optician" or "certified opticien", unless such person holds a current certificate of competence issued by the American Board of Opticianry. Each certificate shall be prominently displayed or maintained in such person's place of business and made available for immediate inspection and review by any consumer or agent of the state of Colorado. No person may associate a service, product, or business name with the title "certified optician" unless such person holds the required certificate of competence. This subsection (1)(d) shall not apply to persons authorized under article 240 or 275 of title 12 to practice medicine or optometry.

Performs or claims orally or in writing to be able to perform the following procedures, and such person is a certified optician:

Vision therapy;

Refractions;

Automated refractions; except that a certified optician may use an auto refractor to provide vision screenings for the sole purpose of determining if the subject of the screening needs a further eye examination;

Refractometry;

Fitting contact lenses;

Keratometry or automated keratometry; or

Any other act that constitutes the practice of optometry or the practice of medicine.

A certified optician does not engage in a deceptive trade practice under subparagraph (II) of this paragraph (d), if said optician performs the described procedures under the direction and supervision of a person who has statutory authority under title 12, C.R.S., to supervise the work of others within the scope of his or her license.

Claims to be a "sign language interpreter", "interpreter for the deaf", "deaf interpreter", "ASL-English interpreter", "American sign language (ASL) interpreter", "translator" for sign language, "transliterator", "certified sign language interpreter", "certified translator" for sign language, "certified interpreter for the deaf", "certified deaf interpreter", "certified ASL-English interpreter", "certified American sign language (ASL) interpreter", or "certified transliterator", unless the person holds:

A currently valid certification issued by the Registry of Interpreters for the Deaf, Inc., or a successor entity; or

Any currently valid certification for sign language interpretation that is approved by the Colorado commission for the deaf, hard of hearing, and deafblind.

A person who uses any of the titles listed in this subsection (1)(e) shall make available for immediate inspection by any consumer or agent of the state:

A currently valid certification from the Registry of Interpreters for the Deaf, Inc., or a successor entity; or

A currently valid certification that is approved in accordance with subsection (1)(e)(I)(B) of this section.

Source:

L. 99:

Entire part added with relocations, p. 647, § 2, effective May 18.

L. 2002:

(1)(c) amended, p. 97, § 1, effective August 7.

L. 2006:

IP(1)(b) amended, p. 1488, § 3, effective June 1.

L. 2008:

(1)(c) repealed, p. 829, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

(1)(e) added, (HB 09-1090), ch. 29, p. 121, § 1, effective September 1; (1)(e) amended, (SB 09-144), ch. 219, p. 993, § 12, effective August 5.

L. 2019:

IP(1) and (1)(e) amended, (HB 19-1069), ch. 114, p. 486, § 1, effective August 2; (1)(d)(I) amended, (HB 19-1172), ch. 136, p. 1644, § 11, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 6-1-105 (1)(dd), (1)(ee.5), (1)(ee.7), and (1)(ee.8), as it existed prior to 1999.

6-1-708. Vehicle sales and leases - deceptive trade practice - definition.

A person engages in a deceptive trade practice when, in the course of the person's business, vocation, or occupation, such person:

Commits any of the following acts pertaining to the sale or lease of a motor vehicle, used motor vehicle, powersports vehicle, or used powersports vehicle:

Guarantees to a purchaser or lessee of a motor vehicle, used motor vehicle, powersports vehicle, or used powersports vehicle who conditions the purchase or lease on the approval of a consumer credit transaction as defined in section 5-1-301 (12) that such purchaser or lessee has been approved for a consumer credit transaction if the approval is not final. For purposes of this subsection (1)(a)(I), "guarantee" means a written document or oral representation between the purchaser or lessee and the person selling or leasing the vehicle that leads such purchaser or lessee to a reasonable good faith belief that the financing of the vehicle is certain.

Accepts a used vehicle as a trade-in on the purchase or lease of a motor vehicle, used motor vehicle, powersports vehicle, or used powersports vehicle and sells or leases the vehicle that has been traded in before the purchaser or lessee has been approved for a consumer credit transaction as defined in section 5-1-301 (12) if the approval is a condition of the purchase or lease;

Fails to return to the consumer any collateral or down payment tendered by the consumer conditioned upon a guarantee by a motor vehicle dealer, used motor vehicle dealer, powersports vehicle dealer, or used powersports vehicle dealer that a consumer credit transaction as defined in section 5-1-301 (12) has been approved if the approval was a condition of the sale or lease and if the financing is not approved and the consumer is required to return the vehicle;

Fails to disclose in writing, prior to sale, to the purchaser that a motor vehicle is a salvage vehicle, as defined in section 42-6-102 (17), or that a vehicle was repurchased by or returned to the manufacturer from a previous owner for inability to conform the motor vehicle to the manufacturer's warranty in accordance with article 10 of title 42 or with any other state or federal motor vehicle warranty law, or knowingly fails to disclose in writing, prior to sale, to the purchaser that a motor vehicle or powersports vehicle has sustained material damage at any one time from any one incident.

For purposes of this section, if a motor vehicle or used motor vehicle dealer guarantees financing and if approval for financing is a condition of the sale or lease, such motor vehicle or used motor vehicle dealer shall not retain any portion of such purchaser's down payment or any trade-in vehicle as payment of rent on any vehicle released by such dealer to such purchaser pending approval of financing even if such dealer has obtained a waiver of such purchaser's right to return a vehicle or has contracted for a rental agreement with such purchaser.

Source:

L. 99:

Entire part added with relocations, p. 650, § 2, effective May 18.

L. 2000:

(1)(a) and (2) amended, p. 244, § 3, effective March 30; (1)(a) amended, p. 1871, § 104, effective August 2.

L. 2001:

(1)(a) amended, p. 1265, § 2, effective June 5.

L. 2007:

(1)(b) amended, p. 2018, § 5, effective June 1.

L. 2017:

(1) amended, (SB 17-240), ch. 395, p. 2064, § 45, effective July 1.

6-1-709. Sales of manufactured and tiny homes - deceptive trade practices.

A person engages in a deceptive trade practice when, in the course of the person's business, vocation, or occupation, the person engages in conduct that constitutes an unlawful manufactured home sales practice or an unlawful tiny home sales practice, as either sales practice is described in section 24-32-3326.

Source:

L. 99:

Entire part added with relocations, p. 651, § 2, effective May 18.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 550, § 5, effective March 5.

L. 2022:

Entire section amended, (HB 22-1242), ch. 172, p. 1136, § 26, effective August 10.

6-1-710. Trafficking of false airbag - deceptive trade practices - criminal liability - definitions.

A person engages in a deceptive trade practice when the person knowingly or intentionally manufactures, imports, distributes, sells, offers for sale, installs, or reinstalls a device intended to replace a supplemental restraint system component if the device is:

A counterfeit supplemental restraint system component;

A nonfunctional airbag; or

Any object in lieu of a supplemental restraint system component that was not designed in accordance with federal safety regulations for the make, model, and year of the motor vehicle in which it is or will be installed.

Any person who violates subsection (1) of this section commits a class 1 misdemeanor.

As used in this section:

"Airbag" means a motor vehicle inflatable occupant restraint system device that is part of a supplemental restraint system.

"Counterfeit supplemental restraint system component" means a replacement supplemental restraint system component that displays a mark identical or substantially similar to the genuine mark of a motor vehicle manufacturer or a supplier of parts to the manufacturer of a motor vehicle without authorization from that manufacturer or supplier.

"Nonfunctional airbag" means a replacement airbag that:

Was previously deployed or damaged;

Has an electric fault that is detected by the motor vehicle's diagnostic systems when the installation procedure is completed and the motor vehicle is returned to the customer who requested the work to be performed or when ownership is intended to be transferred;

Includes a part or object, including a supplemental restraint system component, installed in a motor vehicle to mislead the owner or operator of the motor vehicle into believing that a functional airbag has been installed; or

Is prohibited from being sold or leased in accordance with 49 U.S.C. sec. 30120 (j).

"Supplemental restraint system" means a passive inflatable motor vehicle occupant crash protection system designed for use in conjunction with active restraint systems as described in 49 CFR 571.208. A supplemental restraint system includes:

Each airbag installed in accordance with the motor vehicle manufacturer's design; and

All components required to ensure that an airbag operates as designed in the event of a crash and in accordance with the federal motor vehicle safety standards for the specific make, model, and year of the motor vehicle.

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire section added, p. 197, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

(1) amended and (3) added, (HB 21-1193), ch. 148, p. 865, § 1, effective September 7; (2) amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3134, § 57, effective March 1, 2022.

6-1-711. Restrictions on credit card receipts - legislative declaration - application - definitions.

The general assembly hereby finds, determines, and declares that credit, particularly the use of credit cards, is an important tool for consumers in today's economy. Unscrupulous persons often fraudulently use the credit card accounts of others by stealing the credit card itself or obtaining the necessary information to fraudulently charge the purchase of goods and services to another person's credit card account. The general assembly, therefore, finds, determines, and declares that protection from unauthorized use of credit card accounts is necessary.

No person that accepts credit cards for the transaction of business shall print more than the last five digits of the credit card account number or print the credit card expiration date, or both, on a credit card receipt.

This section shall apply only to receipts that are electronically printed and shall not apply to transactions in which the sole means of recording the credit card number is by handwriting or by an imprint or copy of the credit card.

For the purposes of this section, "credit card" means a card or device existing for the purpose of obtaining money, property, labor, or services on credit; those cards pursuant to which unpaid balances are payable upon demand; and any card or device used to withdraw moneys from a bank account.

Except as provided in paragraph (c) of this subsection (5), this section shall apply to any entity formed on and after April 25, 2002, that uses a cash register or any other machine or device that electronically imprints receipts on credit card transactions and is placed into service on or after April 25, 2002.

Except as provided in paragraph (c) of this subsection (5), on and after January 1, 2004, this section shall apply to any cash register and any other machine or device that electronically imprints receipts on credit card transactions for entities that were formed on or before April 25, 2002.

On and after January 1, 2005, this section shall apply to:

Institutions of higher education; and

Persons who employ no more than twenty-five employees or who have generated no more than five million dollars annually in revenues from the person's business activities.

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire section added, p. 379, § 1, effective April 25.

L. 2006:

(2) amended, p. 1324, § 10, effective July 1.

6-1-712. Discount health plan and cards - deceptive trade practices - definitions.

A person engages in a deceptive trade practice when, in the course of such person's business, vocation, or occupation, such person:

Solicits, markets, advertises, promotes, or sells to a consumer residing in Colorado a discount health plan and such plan materials:

Fail to provide to the consumer a clear and conspicuous disclosure that the discount health plan is not insurance and that the plan only provides for discount health-care services from participating providers within the plan;

Fail to provide the name, address, and telephone number of the administrator of the discount health plan;

Fail to make available to the consumer through a toll-free telephone number, upon request of the consumer, a complete and accurate list of the participating providers within the plan in the consumer's local area and a list of the services for which the discounts are applicable. Such list shall be available to the consumer upon request commencing with the time of purchase and shall be updated at least every six months.

Fail to use common usage for words and phrases in describing the discounts or access to discounts offered, and such failure results in representations of the discounts that are misleading, deceptive, or fraudulent;

Fail to provide to the consumer notice of the right to cancel such discount health plan pursuant to paragraph (c) of this subsection (1);

Offers discounted health services or products that are not authorized by a contract with each provider listed in conjunction with the discount health plan;

Fails to allow a purchaser of a discount health plan to cancel such plan within thirty days after purchase;

Fails to refund all membership fees paid to the discount health plan by the consumer within thirty days after timely notification of the cancellation of the plan to the discount health plan administrator pursuant to paragraph (c) of this subsection (1).

The provisions of this section shall not apply to:

A carrier as defined in section 10-16-102 (8), C.R.S., that offers discounts for services to a covered person, as defined in section 10-16-102 (15), C.R.S., and such services are supplemental to and not part of the health coverage plan of the carrier;

A medicare endorsed drug card as approved by the centers for medicare and medicaid services pursuant to the "Medicare Prescription Drug, Improvement, and Modernization Act of 2003", Public Law 108-173.

For the purposes of this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Health-care services" has the same meaning as in section 10-16-102 (33), C.R.S.

"Provider" has the same meaning as in section 10-16-102 (56), C.R.S.

Source:

L. 2004:

Entire section added, p. 968, § 8, effective May 21.

L. 2013:

(2)(a), (3)(a), and (3)(b) amended, (HB 13-1266), ch. 217, p. 984, § 38, effective May 13.

6-1-713. Disposal of personal identifying information - policy - definitions.

Each covered entity in the state that maintains paper or electronic documents during the course of business that contain personal identifying information shall develop a written policy for the destruction or proper disposal of those paper and electronic documents containing personal identifying information. Unless otherwise required by state or federal law or regulation, the written policy must require that, when such paper or electronic documents are no longer needed, the covered entity shall destroy or arrange for the destruction of such paper and electronic documents within its custody or control that contain personal identifying information by shredding, erasing, or otherwise modifying the personal identifying information in the paper or electronic documents to make the personal identifying information unreadable or indecipherable through any means.

For the purposes of this section and section 6-1-713.5:

"Covered entity" means a person, as defined in section 6-1-102 (6), that maintains, owns, or licenses personal identifying information in the course of the person's business, vocation, or occupation. "Covered entity" does not include a person acting as a third-party service provider as defined in section 6-1-713.5.

"Personal identifying information" means a social security number; a personal identification number; a password; a pass code; an official state or government-issued driver's license or identification card number; a government passport number; biometric data, as defined in section 6-1-716 (1)(a); an employer, student, or military identification number; or a financial transaction device, as defined in section 18-5-701 (3).

A covered entity that is regulated by state or federal law and that maintains procedures for disposal of personal identifying information pursuant to the laws, rules, regulations, guidances, or guidelines established by its state or federal regulator is in compliance with this section.

Unless an entity specifically contracts with a recycler or disposal firm for destruction of documents that contain personal identifying information, nothing herein shall require a recycler or disposal firm to verify that the documents contained in the products it receives for disposal or recycling have been properly destroyed or disposed of as required by this section.

Source:

L. 2004:

Entire section added, p. 1959, § 2, effective August 4.

L. 2018:

(1), (2), and (3) amended, (HB 18-1128), ch. 266, p. 1632, § 1, effective September 1.

Editor's note:

This section was originally numbered as § 6-1-712 in House Bill 04-1311, but has been renumbered on revision for ease of location.

6-1-713.5. Protection of personal identifying information - definition.

To protect personal identifying information, as defined in section 6-1-713 (2), from unauthorized access, use, modification, disclosure, or destruction, a covered entity that maintains, owns, or licenses personal identifying information of an individual residing in the state shall implement and maintain reasonable security procedures and practices that are appropriate to the nature of the personal identifying information and the nature and size of the business and its operations.

Unless a covered entity agrees to provide its own security protection for the information it discloses to a third-party service provider, the covered entity shall require that the third-party service provider implement and maintain reasonable security procedures and practices that are:

Appropriate to the nature of the personal identifying information disclosed to the third-party service provider; and

Reasonably designed to help protect the personal identifying information from unauthorized access, use, modification, disclosure, or destruction.

For the purposes of subsection (2) of this section, a disclosure of personal identifying information does not include disclosure of information to a third party under circumstances where the covered entity retains primary responsibility for implementing and maintaining reasonable security procedures and practices appropriate to the nature of the personal identifying information and the covered entity implements and maintains technical controls that are reasonably designed to:

Help protect the personal identifying information from unauthorized access, use, modification, disclosure, or destruction; or

Effectively eliminate the third party's ability to access the personal identifying information, notwithstanding the third party's physical possession of the personal identifying information.

A covered entity that is regulated by state or federal law and that maintains procedures for protection of personal identifying information pursuant to the laws, rules, regulations, guidances, or guidelines established by its state or federal regulator is in compliance with this section.

For the purposes of this section, "third-party service provider" means an entity that has been contracted to maintain, store, or process personal identifying information on behalf of a covered entity.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire section added, (HB 18-1128), ch. 266, p. 1633, § 2, effective September 1.

6-1-714. Unfair drug pricing practice - deceptive trade practice - definitions.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Emergency" means a declaration made by the department of public health and environment pursuant to section 25-1.5-101 (1)(aa), C.R.S., after the department has determined that there is a shortage of drugs critical to public safety.

"Unfair drug pricing" means charging a consumer an unconscionable amount for the sale of a drug. Unfair drug pricing occurs if:

The price charged by a wholesaler, distributor, or retailer exceeds by more than ten percent the average price for the drug charged by that wholesaler, distributor, or retailer during the thirty days immediately preceding the declaration of an emergency; and

The increase in the amount charged by a wholesaler, distributor, or retailer is not attributable to cost factors of the retailer, including, but not limited to, replacement costs, taxes, and transportation costs incurred by that wholesaler, distributor, or retailer.

A person engages in a deceptive trade practice when, in the course of such person's business, vocation, or occupation, the person engages in the practice of unfair drug pricing.

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire section added, p. 372, § 2, effective April 22.

6-1-715. Confidentiality of social security numbers.

Except as provided in subsections (2) to (4) of this section, a person or entity may not do any of the following:

Publicly post or publicly display in any manner an individual's social security number. "Publicly post" or "publicly display" means to intentionally communicate or otherwise make available to the general public.

Print an individual's social security number on any card required for the individual to access products or services provided by the person or entity;

Require an individual to transmit his or her social security number over the internet, unless the connection is secure or the social security number is encrypted;

Require an individual to use his or her social security number to access an internet website, unless a password or unique personal identification number or other authentication device is also required to access the internet website; and

Print an individual's social security number on any materials that are mailed to the individual, unless state or federal law requires, permits, or authorizes the social security number to be on the document to be mailed. Notwithstanding this paragraph (e), social security numbers may be included in applications and forms sent by mail, including documents sent as part of an application or enrollment process, or to establish, amend, or terminate an account, contract, or policy, or to confirm the accuracy of the social security number. A social security number that is permitted to be mailed under this section may not be printed, in whole or in part, on a postcard or other mailer not requiring an envelope, or visible on the envelope or without the envelope having been opened.

A person or entity that has used, prior to January 1, 2007, an individual's social security number in a manner inconsistent with subsection (1) of this section, may continue using that individual's social security number in that manner on or after January 1, 2007, if all of the following conditions are met:

The use of the social security number is continuous. If the use is stopped for any reason, subsection (1) of this section shall apply.

The person or entity provides the individual with an annual disclosure that informs the individual that he or she has the right to stop the use of his or her social security number in a manner prohibited by subsection (1) of this section.

The person or entity shall implement a written request by an individual to stop the use of his or her social security number in a manner prohibited by subsection (1) of this section within thirty days after the receipt of the request. The person or entity may not impose a fee or charge for implementing the request.

The person or entity shall not deny services to an individual because the individual makes a written request pursuant to paragraph (b) of this subsection (2).

This section shall not prevent the collection, use, or release of a social security number as required, permitted, or authorized by state or federal law or the use of a social security number for internal verification or administrative purposes, including by the department of revenue.

This section shall not apply to:

Documents or records that are recorded or required to be open to the public pursuant to the constitution or laws of this state or by court rule or order, and this section shall not limit access to these documents or records; or

An entity that is subject to the federal "Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996", as amended, 42 U.S.C. secs. 1320d to 1320d-9.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire section added, p. 274, § 1, effective January 1, 2007.

L. 2010:

(4)(b) amended, (HB 10-1422), ch. 419, p. 2063, § 8, effective August 11.